Utah statutes.
76-2-203.   Defenses unavailable in prosecution based on conduct of another.
In any prosecution in which an actor's criminal responsibility is based on the
conduct of another, it is no defense:
(1)  That the actor belongs to a class of persons who by definition of the
offense is legally incapable of committing the offense in an individual
capacity, or
(2)  That the person for whose conduct the actor is criminally responsible has
been acquitted, has not been prosecuted or convicted, has been convicted of a
different offense or of a different type or class of offense or is immune from
prosecution.
